South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5318.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 5, Chapter 4, Title 61 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 61-4-524.  In addition to the permits authorized pursuant to the provisions of this article, the department also may issue a special permit to the owner, or his designee, of an establishment that is permitted to sell beer or wine for on-premises consumption, that is located in this State, which authorizes the purchase and sale for on-premises consumption of beer and wine at an occasion held on the grounds of the establishment outside of normal business hours. The department may charge ten dollars per day for the special permit and may issue up to two special permits per month to each establishment pursuant to this section. Notwithstanding another provision of this article, the issuance of this permit authorizes the permit holder to purchase beer and wine from licensed wholesalers in the same manner that a person with appropriate licenses issued pursuant to this title purchases beer and wine from licensed wholesalers. The department in its discretion may specify the terms and conditions of the permit, pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 4, Title 61, and other applicable provisions under Title 61. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----